en: Apparel & Accessories > Clothing > Baby & Children's Clothing > Baby & Children's Tops: Bodysuits; Cardigans; Hoodies; Overshirts; Polos; Shirts; Sweaters; Sweatshirts; T-Shirts; Tunics
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Quấn áo > Quần áo trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ em > Áo cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ em: Áo liền quần; Áo khoác len; Áo có mũ; Áo khoác sơ mi; Áo thun cổ bẻ; Áo sơ mi; Áo len dài tay; Áo nỉ; Áo thun; Áo chùm hông
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Облекло > Дрехи за бебета и деца > Горнища за бебета и деца: Бодита; Жилетки; Суетшърти с качулка; Връхни ризи; Поло блузи; Ризи; Пуловери; Суетшърти без качулка; Тениски; Туники
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 의류 > 유아동복 > 유아동 드레스: 바디수트; 카디건; 후드티; 오버셔츠; 폴로; 셔츠; 스웨터; 스웻셔츠; 티셔츠; 튜닉
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Oblečenie > Oblečenie pre bábätká a deti > Topy pre bábätká a deti: Body; Kardigány; Mikiny s kapucňou; Košeľové bundy; Polokošele; Košele; Svetre; Mikiny; Tričká; Tuniky
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > เสื้อผ้า > เสื้อผ้าเด็กและทารก > เสื้อเด็กและทารก: บอดี้สูท; เสื้อคาร์ดิแกน; เสื้อฮู้ด; เสื้อเชิ้ตตัวนอก; เสื้อโปโล; เสื้อเชิ้ต; เสื้อสเวตเตอร์; เสื้อแขนยาว; เสื้อยืด; เสื้อคลุม
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Abbigliamento > Abbigliamento per neonati e bambini > Top per neonati e bambini: Body; Cardigan; Felpe con cappuccio; Overshirt; Polo; Camicie; Maglioni; Felpe; T-shirt; Tuniche
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Giyim Eşyaları > Bebek ve Çocuk Giyim > Bebek ve Çocuk Üstleri: Tulum; Hırka; Kapüşonlu Üst; Gömlek Ceket; Polo Tişört; Gömlek; Kazak; Sweatshirt; Tişört; Tunik
es: Ropa y accesorios > Prendas de vestir > Ropa para bebés y niños > Partes superiores para bebés y niños: Bodis; Cárdigan; Sudaderas con capucha; Sobrecamisas; Polos; Camisas; Suéteres; Sudaderas; Camisetas de manga corta; Túnicas
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 衣料品 > ベビー＆子供服 > ベビー＆キッズ用トップス: ボディスーツ; カーディガン; パーカー; オーバーシャツ; ポロシャツ; シャツ; セーター; スウェット; Tシャツ; チュニック
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Vêtements > Vêtements pour bébés et enfants > Hauts pour bébés et enfants: Bodies; Cardigans; Sweats à capuche; Surchemises; Polos; Chemises; Pulls; Sweat-shirts; T-shirts; Tuniques
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Drabužiai > Drabužiai kūdikiams ir vaikams > Viršutinės kūno dalies drabužiai kūdikiams ir vaikams: Bodžiai; Kardiganai; Megztiniai su gobtuvu; Marškiniai-švarkai; Polo marškinėliai; Marškiniai; Megztiniai; Džemperiai; Marškinėliai; Tunikos
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Oblečení > Oblečení pro miminka a děti > Horní díly oblečení pro děti a kojence: Body; Kardigany; Mikiny s kapucí; Košilové bundy; Polo trička; Košile; Svetry; Mikiny; Trička; Tuniky
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Kleding > Baby- en kinderkleding > Baby- & kinderbovenkleding: Bodysuits; Cardigans; Hoody's; Overhemden; Polo's; Hemden; Truien; Sweatshirts; T-shirts; Tunieken
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Roupas > Roupas para bebês e crianças > Roupas da parte superior para bebês e crianças: Macacões; Cardigãs; Moletons com capuz; Sobrecamisas; Polos; Camisas; Suéteres; Moletons; Camisetas; Túnicas
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Одежда > Детская одежда > Детские кофты и футболки: Боди; Кардиганы; Худи; Рубашки-куртки; Поло; Рубашки; Свитеры; Толстовки; Футболки; Туники
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Ruházat > Baba- és gyermekruházat > Baba- és gyermekfelsők: Body-k; Kardigánok; Kapucnis pulóverek; Hosszabbított pólók; Galléros pólók; Ingek; Pulóverek; Melegítő felsők; Pólók; Tunikák
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Bekleidung > Baby- & Kinderbekleidung > Oberteile für Babys & Kinder: Bodys; Strickjacken; Kapuzenpullis; Überhemden; Polos; Shirts; Pullover; Sweatshirts; T-Shirts; Tuniken
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Odzież > Odzież dla niemowląt i dzieci > Górne części odzieży dla niemowląt i dzieci: Body; Kardigany; Bluzy z kapturem; Koszule overshirt; Koszulki polo; Koszulki; Swetry; Bluzy; T-shirty; Tuniki
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Klädsel > Baby- och barnkläder > Tröjor för baby och barn: Bodies; Koftor; Hoodies; Överskjortor; Pikétröjor; Skjortor; Tröjor; Sweatshirts; T-shirts; Tunikor
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Ενδύματα > Βρεφικά & Παιδικά Ρούχα > Βρεφικές & παιδικές μπλούζες: Κορμάκια; Ζακέτες; Φούτερ με κουκούλα; Πουκάμισα overshirt; Πόλο; Πουκάμισα; Πουλόβερ; Φούτερ; Κοντομάνικα μπλουζάκια; Τούνικ
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Oblačila > Oblačila za dojenčke in otroke > Zgornji deli za dojenčke in otroke: Bodiji; Jopice; Puloverji s kapuco; Srajčne jakne; Polo majice; Srajce; Puloverji; Majice z dolgimi rokavi; Kratke majice; Tunike
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Vaatteet > Vauvojen ja lasten vaatteet > Vauvojen ja lasten yläosat: Bodyt; Neuletakit; Hupparit; Päällyspaidat; Poolot; Paidat; Neulepuserot; Collegepuserot; T-paidat; Tunikat
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Odjeća > Odjeća za bebe i djecu > Gornji dijelovi za bebe i djecu: Bodiji; Kardigani; Majice s kapuljačom; Gornje majice; Polo majice; Košulje; Džemperi; Gornji dio trenirke; Majice kratkih rukava; Tunike
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Îmbrăcăminte > Îmbrăcăminte pentru bebeluși și copii > Topuri pentru bebeluși și copii: Costume de baie întregi; Cardigane; Hanorace; Jachete tip cămașă; Tricouri polo; Cămăși; Pulovere; Bluze de trening; Tricouri; Tunici
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 服装 > 婴儿及儿童服饰 > 婴儿及儿童上装: 连体衣; 开衫; 连帽衫; 外套式衬衫; 保罗衫; 衬衫; 毛衣; 卫衣; T 恤; 束腰外衣
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Klesplagg > Baby- og barneklær > Topper til baby og barn: Bodysuits; Kardiganer; Hettegensere; Overskjorter; Poloskjorter; Skjorter; Gensere; Gensere; T-skjorter; Tunikaer
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tøj > Tøj til babyer og børn > Overdele til babyer og børn: Bodyer; Cardigans; Hættetrøjer; Overtrøjer; Poloer; Skjorter; Sweatere; Sweatshirts; T-shirts; Tunikaer
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 衣著 > 嬰兒與兒童服裝 > 嬰兒與兒童上衣: 連身衣; 開襟毛衣; 連帽上衣; 外套式襯衫; Polo 衫; 襯衫; 毛衣; 運動衫; T 恤; 束腰衫
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Vestuário > Roupa para bebé e criança > Tops para bebé e criança: Bodies; Casacos de malha; Camisolas com capuz; Sobrecamisas; Polos; Camisas; Camisolas; Sweatshirts; T-shirts; Túnicas